phonology/02_dagesh.xfst
!
! 02_dagesh.xfst - Dagesh Placement Rules
! Lene and Forte dagesh rules
!
! References: Joüon-Muraoka §§14-16, GKC §§20-22
!

!
! ============================================================
! DEFINITIONS
! ============================================================

define BGDKPT [ b | g | d | k | p | t ] .
define Velar [ k | g | q ] .
define LABIAL [ b | p | m | w ] .

!
! ============================================================
! Dagesh Lene (Lenition)
! Insert dagesh in BGDKPT after:
!  1. A vowel (not at start of word - special case)
!  2. Consecutive consonant (gemination)
! ============================================================

define Dagesh_Lene_Vowel
  0 -> d: || Vowel _ BGDKPT .
  
define Dagesh_Lene_Gemination
  BGDKPT -> d:BGDKPT || BGDKPT _ BGDKPT .

!
! ============================================================
! Dagesh Forte (Gemination)
! Insert dagesh from:
!  1. Nun assimilation ( נ + C → C with dagesh)
!  2. Piel/Hithpael gemination
!  3. Intensified forms
! ============================================================

define Dagesh_Forte_Nun
  n -> d:n || _ [ b | g | d | k | p | t | m | n | r | l | s | š ] .
  
define Dagesh_Forte_Gemination
  [ b | g | d | k | p | t | m | n | r | l | s | š ] -> d:[ b | g | d | k | p | t | m | n | r | l | s | š ] || [ b | g | d | k | p | t | m | n | r | l | s | š ] _ [i | e] .

!
! ============================================================
! NO DAGESH in gutturals
! Gutturals cannot take dagesh forte
! ============================================================

define No_Dagesh_Guttural
  d:b -> 0 || _ [ h | 3 | h | r ] .
  d:g -> 0 || _ [ h | 3 | h | r ] .
  d:k -> 0 || _ [ h | 3 | h | r ] .
  d:p -> 0 || _ [ h | 3 | h | r ] .
  d:t -> 0 || _ [ h | 3 | h | r ] .
  d:m -> 0 || _ [ h | 3 | h | r ] .
  d:n -> 0 || _ [ h | 3 | h | r ] .
  d:r -> 0 || _ [ h | 3 | h | r ] .
  d:l -> 0 || _ [ h | 3 | h | r ] .
  d:s -> 0 || _ [ h | 3 | h | r ] .

!
! ============================================================
! Dagesh in prepositions (BGDKPT after מן)
! מ followed by BGDKPT takes dagesh
! ============================================================

define Dagesh_Mem_Prep
  d:b -> d:b || m _ b .
  d:g -> d:g || m _ g .
  d:k -> d:k || m _ k .
  d:p -> d:p || m _ p .
  d:t -> d:t || m _ t .

!
! ============================================================
! Compose dagesh rules
! ============================================================

define DageshRules
  Dagesh_Lene_Vowel
  .o.
  Dagesh_Lene_Gemination
  .o.
  Dagesh_Forte_Nun
  .o.
  Dagesh_Forte_Gemination
  .o.
  No_Dagesh_Guttural
  .o.
  Dagesh_Mem_Prep
;

regex DageshRules;
